Utah statutes.
78B-5-502.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Debt" means a legally enforceable monetary obligation or liability of an
individual, whether arising out of contract, tort, or otherwise.
(2)  "Dependent" means the spouse of an individual, and the grandchild or the
natural or adoptive child of an individual who derives support primarily from
that individual.
(3)  "Exempt" means protected, and "exemption" means protection from
subjection to a judicial process to collect an unsecured debt.
(4)  "Judicial lien" means a lien on property obtained by judgment or other
legal process instituted for the purpose of collecting an unsecured debt.
(5)  "Levy" means the seizure of property pursuant to any legal process issued
for the purpose of collecting an unsecured debt.
(6)  "Lien" means a judicial, or statutory lien, in property securing payment
of a debt or performance of an obligation.
(7)  "Liquid assets" means deposits, securities, notes, drafts, unpaid
earnings not otherwise exempt, accrued vacation pay, refunds, prepayments, and
other receivables.
(8)  "Security interest" means an interest in property created by contract to
secure payment or performance of an obligation.
(9)  "Statutory lien" means a lien arising by force of a statute, but does not
include a security interest or a judicial lien.
(10)  "Value" means fair market value of an individual's interest in property,
exclusive of valid liens.
